Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Chapter 40. Judicial Proceedings Involving Legislators.

Sec. 24.40.010.
Immunities.

A legislator may not be held to answer before any other tribunal for any statement made in the exercise of legislative duties while the legislature is in session.
A member attending, going to, or returning from legislative sessions is not subject to civil process and is privileged from arrest except for felony or breach of the peace. The immunities provided in this section extend to a legislator attending, going to, or returning from a meeting of an interim standing or special committee of the legislature of which the legislator is a member.
For the purposes of going to and returning from a session or meeting, the immunities provided extend to a legislator for a period of five days immediately preceding and following the legislator’s attendance at the session or meeting.

History.

(§ 8 ch 157 SLA 1959)

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions on legislative immunity, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 6.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A “session” is the sitting of the legislature during the period of time that it is convened as a legislature to do business as a legislative body. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

The privilege from arrest does not extend to those violations of our law which constitute a “felony or breach of the peace.” In these two categories a member of the state legislature stands in the eyes of the law as any other citizen. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

Members of the state legislature, while “going to,” “attending” or “returning from” a legislative session enjoy an absolute immunity against civil process. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

Immunity against civil process cannot be waived by the legislator since the Alaska immunity is intended to protect the public as well as serve the convenience of the legislators. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

Members of the legislature have only a “privilege” from arrest, which must be asserted or it may be deemed waived. See 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

The immunity of legislators under this section runs from the time the member is “going to” or “returning from” a legislative session, 24 hours a day, seven days a week from the time that the legislature is convened to the time that it adjourns sine die. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

Executions are “civil process.”
1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

A legislator is immune from all civil process during the legislative session, including garnishment of wages; garnishment under a continuing writ must therefore be suspended at least five days before the session begins and may not be reinstated until after the session adjourns pursuant to AS

24.40.010

.
Dec. 10, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

Nature and extent of privilege accorded public statements, relating to subject of legislative business or concern, made by member of state or local legislature or council outside of formal proceedings. 41 ALR4th 1116.

Sec. 24.40.020.
Continuance in a criminal proceeding where defendant, defense attorney, or witness is a member of the legislature.

Upon a showing that the attorney of record at the time of the defendant’s first appearance in the court of record or a principal witness or a party in a criminal proceeding is a member of the legislature and that the legislature is in session or that a legislative interim committee of which the legislator is a member is meeting or is to meet within the next seven days, the defendant is entitled to a reasonable continuance of the date of trial until at least 15 days after the legislative session or interim committee meeting. However, a continuance for this reason shall not exceed 30 days after recess of the legislature or interim committee.
A continuance may not be granted for any longer time than it is affirmatively proved the ends of justice require.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1959)

Sec. 24.40.030.
[Repealed, § 39 ch 53 SLA 1973.]

Sec. 24.40.031.
Postponement of civil proceedings when a party or attorney is a member of the legislature.

When it appears that a party or an attorney of record of a party to a civil action is a member of the legislature of this state, and that the legislature is in session, the action shall be continued until 10 days after the legislature has adjourned, unless the party or attorney upon the call of the action for trial waives the benefit of this section.
When it appears that a party or an attorney of record of a party to a civil action is a member of the Alaska Legislative Council, the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee, or one of their subcommittees, the action shall be continued when the legislative council, budget and audit committee, or the subcommittee, as the case may be, is holding a meeting, unless the party or attorney upon the call of the action for trial waives the benefit of this section.
When it is necessary to file a brief or memorandum of law in an action that has been continued under the provisions of this section, the action shall be continued for a time sufficient to prepare and file the brief or memorandum.

History.

(§ 1 ch 131 SLA 1974)